Connecticut, session 2026, HB05343.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
"state agency" means any department, board, council, commission or
other executive branch agency of state government, but does not include
the constituent units, as defined in section 10a-1 of the general statutes.
(b) Not later than November 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, each
state agency shall provide a summary of all advertising purchased by
such state agency during the preceding fiscal year, including the
amounts spent and any information specified in subsection (c) of this
section, to the Commissioner of Administrative Services, in a form and
manner prescribed by the commissioner.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
Commissioner of Administrative Services shall, within available
appropriations, submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
government administration. The report shall summarize any
advertising purchased by state agencies during the preceding fiscal year

House Bill No. 5343
and the amounts spent by such agencies on such advertising, as
reported to the commissioner pursuant to subsection (b) of this section,
organized in the following categories: (1) The overall advertising
spending by each state agency, (2) the names of each advertising vendor
that received individual advertising contracts from a state agency and
the amount of such contract, (3) the method of advertising, categorized
by media type, including, but not limited to, Internet search platforms,
national news outlets, digital platforms and local news outlets, and (4)
the general subject matter of the advertising.
(d) The commissioner shall accept any volunteer assistance from
institutions of higher education in the state or other neutral third parties
with relevant expertise to assist the state agencies to report the data
provided to the commissioner pursuant to this section and to produce
such report.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than January 1, 2027,
and annually thereafter, the chancellor of the Connecticut State Colleges
and Universities and the president of The University of Connecticut
shall, within available appropriations, each submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to government administration. Each such
report shall summarize the following information for the preceding
fiscal year for advertising purchased centrally through the offices of
communications at the Connecticut State Colleges and Universities and
The University of Connecticut: (1) The total cost of advertising spent; (2)
the names of each advertising vendor paid more than fifty thousand
dollars; (3) the method of advertising, categorized by media type,
including, but not limited to, Internet search platforms, national news
outlets, digital platforms and local news outlets; and (4) the general
subject matter of the advertising.
Public Act No. 26-140 2 of 3

House Bill No. 5343
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-140 3 of 3